trunk/apertium-mk-en/apertium-mk-en.mk.dix
<!-- 2b -->
<pardef n="оздрав/и__vblex"> <!-- perf perf"/><s n="iv --> <!-- свършен вид -->
  <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ам</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>иш</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>име</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ите</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ат</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ев</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>евме</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>евте</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еа</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ел</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ела</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ело</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еле</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ев</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>е</l>           <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>е</l>           <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>евме</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>евте</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еа</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ел</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ела</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ело</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еле</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


  <e>        <p>          <l>ен</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ениот</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ениов</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>енион</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ена</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ената</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>енава</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>енана</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ено</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еното</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еново</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еноно</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ени</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ените</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ениве</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>енине</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<e lm="избрбори"><i>избрбор</i><par n="оздрав/и__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="набрбори"><i>набрбор</i><par n="оздрав/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="побрбори"><i>побрбор</i><par n="оздрав/и__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="разбрбори"><i>разбрбор</i><par n="оздрав/и__vblex"/></e>
